Virginia statutes. Title 37.2. Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.
Article 5. Involuntary Admissions.

§ 37.2-814.
Commitment hearing for involuntary admission; written explanation; right to counsel; rights of petitioner.

The commitment hearing for involuntary admission shall be held after a sufficient period of time has passed to allow for completion of the examination required by §

37.2-815

, preparation of the preadmission screening report required by §

37.2-816

, and initiation of mental health treatment to stabilize the person’s psychiatric condition to avoid involuntary commitment where possible, but shall be held within 72 hours of the execution of the temporary detention order as provided for in §

37.2-809

; however, if the 72-hour period herein specified terminates on a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed, the person may be detained, as herein provided, until the close of business on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, legal holiday, or day on which the court is lawfully closed.

At the commencement of the commitment hearing, the district court judge or special justice shall inform the person whose involuntary admission is being sought of his right to apply for voluntary admission for inpatient treatment as provided for in §

37.2-805

and shall afford the person an opportunity for voluntary admission. The district court judge or special justice shall advise the person whose involuntary admission is being sought that if the person chooses to be voluntarily admitted pursuant to §

37.2-805

, such person will be prohibited from possessing, purchasing, or transporting a firearm pursuant to §

18.2-308.1:3

. The judge or special justice shall ascertain if the person is then willing and capable of seeking voluntary admission for inpatient treatment. In determining whether a person is capable of consenting to voluntary admission, the judge or special justice may consider evidence regarding the person’s past compliance or noncompliance with treatment. If the judge or special justice finds that the person is capable and willingly accepts voluntary admission for inpatient treatment, the judge or special justice shall require him to accept voluntary admission for a minimum period of treatment not to exceed 72 hours. After such minimum period of treatment, the person shall give the facility 48 hours’ notice prior to leaving the facility. During this notice period, the person shall not be discharged except as provided in §

37.2-837

,

37.2-838

, or

37.2-840

. The person shall be subject to the transportation provisions as provided in §

37.2-829

and the requirement for preadmission screening by a community services board as provided in §

37.2-805

.

If a person is incapable of accepting or unwilling to accept voluntary admission and treatment, the judge or special justice shall inform the person of his right to a commitment hearing and right to counsel. The judge or special justice shall ascertain if the person whose admission is sought is represented by counsel, and, if he is not represented by counsel, the judge or special justice shall appoint an attorney to represent him. However, if the person requests an opportunity to employ counsel, the judge or special justice shall give him a reasonable opportunity to employ counsel at his own expense.

A written explanation of the involuntary admission process and the statutory protections associated with the process shall be given to the person, and its contents shall be explained by an attorney prior to the commitment hearing. The written explanation shall describe, at a minimum, the person’s rights to (i) retain private counsel or be represented by a court-appointed attorney, (ii) present any defenses including independent evaluation and expert testimony or the testimony of other witnesses, (iii) be present during the hearing and testify, (iv) appeal any order for involuntary admission to the circuit court, and (v) have a jury trial on appeal. The judge or special justice shall ascertain whether the person whose involuntary admission is sought has been given the written explanation required herein.

To the extent possible, during or before the commitment hearing, the attorney for the person whose involuntary admission is sought shall interview his client, the petitioner, the examiner described in §

37.2-815

, the community services board staff, and any other material witnesses. He also shall examine all relevant diagnostic and other reports, present evidence and witnesses, if any, on his client’s behalf, and otherwise actively represent his client in the proceedings. A health care provider shall disclose or make available all such reports, treatment information, and records concerning his client to the attorney, upon request. The role of the attorney shall be to represent the wishes of his client, to the extent possible.

The petitioner shall be given adequate notice of the place, date, and time of the commitment hearing. The petitioner shall be entitled to retain counsel at his own expense, to be present during the hearing, and to testify and present evidence. The petitioner shall be encouraged but shall not be required to testify at the hearing, and the person whose involuntary admission is sought shall not be released solely on the basis of the petitioner’s failure to attend or testify during the hearing.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.3; 1979, c. 426; 1980, cc. 166, 582; 1982, c. 471; 1984, c. 277; 1985, c. 261; 1986, cc. 349, 609; 1988, c. 225; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 59, 60, 728, 798; 1991, c. 636; 1992, c. 752; 1994, cc. 736, 907; 1995, cc. 489, 668, 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1997, cc. 558, 921; 1998, c. 446; 2001, cc. 478, 479, 507, 658, 837; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 751, 788, 850, 870; 2009, c. 647; 2014, cc. 499, 538, 691.

Cross references.

As to health records which are excluded from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

.

As to review of continuation of confinement hearings, procedures and reports for persons found not guilty by reason of insanity, see §

19.2-182.5

.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 751 and 788 are nearly identical, and inserted the present second sentence in subsection B.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 850 and 870 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “after a sufficient period of time has passed to allow for completion of the examination required by §

37.2-815

, preparation of the preadmission screening report required by §

37.2-816

, and initiation of mental health treatment to stabilize the person’s psychiatric condition to avoid involuntary commitment where possible, but shall be held,” near the beginning and inserted “close of business on the” near the end; in subsection B, substituted “for inpatient treatment” for “and treatment” three times, substituted “facility” for “hospital” twice, and deleted “or behavioral health authority” once in subsection B and once in subsection E.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 647 added the fourth sentence in subsection B.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 499, 538, and 691 are identical and, in subsection A, substituted “72” for “48” twice; and in subsection B inserted “or transporting” in the second sentence and made related changes.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2001 Involuntary Commitment Process — Written Explanation; No. 9-2028 Order for Treatment of Incompetent Defendant — Another Form.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

10A M.J. Insane and Other Incompetent Persons, § 3.

§ 37.2-815.
(Effective until October 1, 2022) Commitment hearing for involuntary admission; examination required.

Notwithstanding §

37.2-814

, the district court judge or special justice shall require an examination of the person who is the subject of the hearing by a psychiatrist or a psychologist who is licensed in Virginia by the Board of Medicine or the Board of Psychology and is qualified in the diagnosis of mental illness or, if such a psychiatrist or psychologist is not available, a mental health professional who (i) is licensed in Virginia through the Department of Health Professions as a clinical social worker, professional counselor, marriage and family therapist, psychiatric nurse practitioner, or clinical nurse specialist, (ii) is qualified in the assessment of mental illness, and (iii) has completed a certification program approved by the Department. The examiner chosen shall be able to provide an independent clinical evaluation of the person and recommendations for his placement, care, and treatment. The examiner shall (a) not be related by blood or marriage to the person, (b) not be responsible for treating the person, (c) have no financial interest in the admission or treatment of the person, (d) have no investment interest in the facility detaining or admitting the person under this chapter, and (e) except for employees of state hospitals, the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, and community service boards, not be employed by the facility. For purposes of this section, the term “investment interest” shall be as defined in §

37.2-809

.

The examination conducted pursuant to this section shall be a comprehensive evaluation of the person conducted in-person or, if that is not practicable, by two-way electronic video and audio communication system as authorized in §

37.2-804.1

. Translation or interpreter services shall be provided during the evaluation where necessary. The examination shall consist of (i) a clinical assessment that includes a mental status examination; determination of current use of psychotropic and other medications; a medical and psychiatric history; a substance use, abuse, or dependency determination; and a determination of the likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs; (ii) a substance abuse screening, when indicated; (iii) a risk assessment that includes an evaluation of the likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any; (iv) an assessment of the person’s capacity to consent to treatment, including his ability to maintain and communicate choice, understand relevant information, and comprehend the situation and its consequences; (v) a review of the temporary detention facility’s records for the person, including the treating physician’s evaluation, any collateral information, reports of any laboratory or toxicology tests conducted, and all admission forms and nurses’ notes; (vi) a discussion of treatment preferences expressed by the person or contained in a document provided by the person in support of recovery; (vii) an assessment of whether the person meets the criteria for an order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of inpatient treatment pursuant to subsection C1 of §

37.2-817

; (viii) an assessment of alternatives to involuntary inpatient treatment; and (ix) recommendations for the placement, care, and treatment of the person.

All such examinations shall be conducted in private. The judge or special justice shall summons the examiner who shall certify that he has personally examined the person and state whether he has probable cause to believe that the person (i) has a mental illness and there is a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, (a) cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any, or (b) suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs, and (ii) requires involuntary inpatient treatment. The judge or special justice shall not render any decision on the petition until the examiner has presented his report. The examiner may report orally at the hearing, but he shall provide a written report of his examination prior to the hearing. The examiner’s written certification may be accepted into evidence unless objected to by the person or his attorney, in which case the examiner shall attend in person or by electronic communication. When the examiner attends the hearing in person or by electronic communication, the examiner shall not be excluded from the hearing pursuant to an order of sequestration of witnesses.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.3; 1979, c. 426; 1980, cc. 166, 582; 1982, c. 471; 1984, c. 277; 1985, c. 261; 1986, cc. 349, 609; 1988, c. 225; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 59, 60, 728, 798; 1991, c. 636; 1992, c. 752; 1994, cc. 736, 907; 1995, cc. 489, 668, 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1997, cc. 558, 921; 1998, c. 446; 2001, cc. 478, 479, 507, 658, 837; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, c. 716; 2007, c. 400; 2008, cc. 779, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 21, 132, 838; 2010, cc. 330, 461.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 763, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2022.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 400 inserted “community service boards, and behavioral health authorities,” and made a related change in the third sentence in the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 779, in subsection C, inserted “state whether he” following “examined the person and” and substituted the present provisions of clause (i) for “does or does not present an imminent danger to himself or others as a result of mental illness or is or is not so seriously mentally ill as to be substantially unable to care for himself.”

The 2008 amendments by cc. 850 and 870 are identical, added the subsection designations, and in subsection A, substituted “a mental health professional” for “any mental health professional,” deleted “is” preceding clause (i), substituted “is licensed in Virginia through the Department of Health Professions as a clinical social worker, professional counselor, psychiatric nurse practitioner, or clinical nurse specialist” for “licensed in Virginia through the Department of Health Professions and” in clause (i), substituted “is qualified in the assessment of mental illness, and” for “qualified in the diagnosis of mental illness” in clause (ii), added clause (iii), rewrote the present third sentence, and deleted “and behavioral health authorities” at the end of the next-to-last sentence; inserted subsection B; and rewrote subsection C and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by c. 21, effective February 23, 2009, and c. 838, effective April 8, 2009, are identical and added the last sentence in subsection C.

The 2009 amendment by c. 132 inserted “marriage and family therapist” following “professional counselor” in clause (i) in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 330 and 461 are identical, and inserted present clause B (vii) and redesignated former clauses B (vii) and (viii) as clauses B (viii) and (ix).

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2009).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2003 Order of Appointment of Examiner.

§ 37.2-815.
(Effective October 1, 2022) Commitment hearing for involuntary admission; examination required.

Notwithstanding §

37.2-814

, the district court judge or special justice shall require an examination of the person who is the subject of the hearing by a psychiatrist or a psychologist who is licensed in Virginia by the Board of Medicine or the Board of Psychology and is qualified in the diagnosis of mental illness or, if such a psychiatrist or psychologist is not available, a mental health professional who (i) is licensed in Virginia through the Department of Health Professions as a clinical social worker, professional counselor, marriage and family therapist, psychiatric nurse practitioner, or clinical nurse specialist, (ii) is qualified in the assessment of mental illness, and (iii) has completed a certification program approved by the Department. The examiner chosen shall be able to provide an independent clinical evaluation of the person and recommendations for his placement, care, and treatment. The examiner shall (a) not be related by blood or marriage to the person, (b) not be responsible for treating the person, (c) have no financial interest in the admission or treatment of the person, (d) have no investment interest in the facility detaining or admitting the person under this chapter, and (e) except for employees of state hospitals, the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, and community service boards, not be employed by the facility. For purposes of this section, the term “investment interest” shall be as defined in §

37.2-809

.

The examination conducted pursuant to this section shall be a comprehensive evaluation of the person conducted in-person or, if that is not practicable, by two-way electronic video and audio communication system as authorized in §

37.2-804.1

. Translation or interpreter services shall be provided during the evaluation where necessary. The examination shall consist of (i) a clinical assessment that includes a mental status examination; determination of current use of psychotropic and other medications; a medical and psychiatric history; a substance use, abuse, or dependency determination; and a determination of the likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs; (ii) a substance abuse screening, when indicated; (iii) a risk assessment that includes an evaluation of the likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any; (iv) an assessment of the person’s capacity to consent to treatment, including his ability to maintain and communicate choice, understand relevant information, and comprehend the situation and its consequences; (v) a review of the temporary detention facility’s records for the person, including the treating physician’s evaluation, any collateral information, reports of any laboratory or toxicology tests conducted, and all admission forms and nurses’ notes; (vi) a discussion of treatment preferences expressed by the person or contained in a document provided by the person in support of recovery; (vii) an assessment of whether the person meets the criteria for an order authorizing discharge to mandatory outpatient treatment following a period of inpatient treatment pursuant to subsection C of §

37.2-817.01

; (viii) an assessment of alternatives to involuntary inpatient treatment; and (ix) recommendations for the placement, care, and treatment of the person.

All such examinations shall be conducted in private. The judge or special justice shall summons the examiner who shall certify that he has personally examined the person and state whether he has probable cause to believe that the person (i) has a mental illness and there is a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, (a) cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any, or (b) suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs, and (ii) requires involuntary inpatient treatment. The judge or special justice shall not render any decision on the petition until the examiner has presented his report. The examiner may report orally at the hearing, but he shall provide a written report of his examination prior to the hearing. The examiner’s written certification may be accepted into evidence unless objected to by the person or his attorney, in which case the examiner shall attend in person or by electronic communication. When the examiner attends the hearing in person or by electronic communication, the examiner shall not be excluded from the hearing pursuant to an order of sequestration of witnesses.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.3; 1979, c. 426; 1980, cc. 166, 582; 1982, c. 471; 1984, c. 277; 1985, c. 261; 1986, cc. 349, 609; 1988, c. 225; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 59, 60, 728, 798; 1991, c. 636; 1992, c. 752; 1994, cc. 736, 907; 1995, cc. 489, 668, 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1997, cc. 558, 921; 1998, c. 446; 2001, cc. 478, 479, 507, 658, 837; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, c. 716; 2007, c. 400; 2008, cc. 779, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 21, 132, 838; 2010, cc. 330, 461; 2022, c. 763.

For this section as in effect until October 1, 2022,

see the bound volume.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 482, substituted “C of §

37.2-817

.01” for “C1 of §

37.2-817

” in subclause (vii) of subsection B.

§ 37.2-816.
Commitment hearing for involuntary admission; preadmission screening report.

The district court judge or special justice shall require a preadmission screening report from the community services board that serves the county or city where the person resides or, if impractical, where the person is located. The report shall be admitted as evidence of the facts stated therein and shall state (i) whether the person has a mental illness and whether there exists a substantial likelihood that, as a result of mental illness, the person will, in the near future, (a) cause serious physical harm to himself or others as evidenced by recent behavior causing, attempting, or threatening harm and other relevant information, if any, or (b) suffer serious harm due to his lack of capacity to protect himself from harm or to provide for his basic human needs, (ii) whether the person is in need of involuntary inpatient treatment, (iii) whether there is no less restrictive alternative to inpatient treatment, and (iv) the recommendations for that person’s placement, care, and treatment including, where appropriate, recommendations for mandatory outpatient treatment. The board shall provide the preadmission screening report to the court prior to the hearing, and the report shall be admitted into evidence and made part of the record of the case. In the case of a person who has been sentenced and committed to the Department of Corrections and who has been examined by a psychiatrist or clinical psychologist, the judge or special justice may proceed to adjudicate whether the person has mental illness and should be involuntarily admitted without requesting a preadmission screening report from the community services board.

History.

1976, c. 671, § 37.1-67.3; 1979, c. 426; 1980, cc. 166, 582; 1982, c. 471; 1984, c. 277; 1985, c. 261; 1986, cc. 349, 609; 1988, c. 225; 1989, c. 716; 1990, cc. 59, 60, 728, 798; 1991, c. 636; 1992, c. 752; 1994, cc. 736, 907; 1995, cc. 489, 668, 844; 1996, cc. 343, 893; 1997, cc. 558, 921; 1998, c. 446; 2001, cc. 478, 479, 507, 658, 837; 2004, cc. 66, 1014; 2005, c. 716; 2008, cc. 779, 850, 870; 2009, cc. 21, 838.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 779 substituted the existing provisions of clause (i) for “whether the person presents an imminent danger to himself or others as a result of mental illness or is so seriously mentally ill that he is substantially unable to care for himself.”

The 2008 amendments by cc. 850 and 870 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by c. 21, effective February 23, 2009, and c. 838, effective April 8, 2009, are identical and substituted “admitted” for “admissible” near the beginning in the second sentence and added “and the report shall be admitted into evidence and made part of the record of the case” at the end of the next-to-last sentence.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 473 (2009).